Utah statutes.
13-22-22.   Charitable sales promotions.

(1)  Every charitable organization which agrees to permit a charitable sales promotion to be conducted by a commercial co-venturer on its behalf shall file with the division a notice of the promotion prior to its commencement within this state.  The notice shall state:

(a)  the names of the charitable organization and commercial co-venturer;

(b)  that the charitable organization and the commercial co-venturer will conduct a charitable sales promotion; and

(c)  the date the charitable sales promotion is expected to commence.

(2)  Prior to the commencement of a charitable sales promotion within this state, every charitable organization which agrees to permit a charitable sales promotion to be conducted in its behalf, shall obtain a written agreement, containing such terms as may be required by rule of the division, from the commercial co-venturer which shall be available to the division upon request.

(3)  A commercial co-venturer shall keep the final accounting for each charitable sales promotion conducted in this state for three years after the final accounting date and make the accounting available to the division upon request.

(4)  The commercial co-venturer shall disclose in each advertisement for a charitable sales promotion the dollar amount or percent per unit of goods or services purchased or used that will benefit the charitable organization or purpose.

